code/schinke.sbl
strings ( noun_form  verb_form )

routines (

   map_letters
   que_word
)

externals ( stem )

define map_letters as (

    do repeat ( goto ( ['j'] ) <- 'i' )
    do repeat ( goto ( ['v'] ) <- 'u' )
)

backwardmode (

    define que_word as (

        ['que'] (
            among (
                'at' 'quo' 'ne' 'ita' 'abs' 'aps' 'abus' 'adae' 'adus'
                'deni' 'de' 'sus' 'obli' 'perae' 'plenis' 'quando' 'quis'
                'quae' 'cuius' 'cui' 'quem' 'quam' 'qua' 'qui'
                'quorum' 'quarum' 'quibus' 'quos' 'quas' 'quotusquis'
                'quous' 'ubi' 'undi' 'us' 'uter' 'uti' 'utro' 'utribi'
                'tor' 'co' 'conco' 'contor' 'detor' 'deco' 'exco' 'extor'
                'obtor' 'optor' 'retor' 'reco' 'attor' 'inco' 'intor'
                'praetor'
            ) atlimit ]
            -> noun_form
            -> verb_form
        ) or fail(delete)
    )
)

define stem as (

    map_letters

    backwards (
        que_word or (
            do (
                [tolimit]
                -> noun_form
                -> verb_form
            )

            $noun_form backwards try (
                [substring] hop 2
                among (
                    'ibus' 'ius' 'ae' 'am' 'as' 'em' 'es' 'ia' 'is' 'nt'
                    'os' 'ud' 'um' 'us' 'a' 'e' 'i' 'o' 'u'
                        (delete)
                )
            )

            $verb_form backwards try (
                [substring] hop 2
                among (
                    'iuntur' 'erunt' 'untur' 'iunt' 'unt'
                         (<-'i')
                    'beris' 'bor' 'bo'
                         (<-'bi')
                    'ero'
                         (<-'eri')
                    'mini' 'ntur' 'stis' 'mur' 'mus' 'ris' 'sti' 'tis'
                    'tur' 'ns' 'nt' 'ri' 'm' 'r' 's' 't'
                         (delete)
                )
            )
        )
    )

    /* the stemmed words are left in noun-form and verb-form, and can
       be picked up as C strings at z->S[0] and z->S[1] through the API. */
)
